Louisiana, session 2026, SB430.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4574.1.1(A)(24)(c)(ii) is hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§4574.1.1. Occupancy taxes levied by the commissions
A. For the purposes set forth in this Subsection or Paragraph (F)(3) of this
Section, a commission created pursuant to R.S. 33:4574(B) is authorized to levy and
collect a tax upon the occupancy of hotel rooms, motel rooms, and overnight
camping facilities within the jurisdiction of the commission. Such tax shall not
exceed the following percentages of the rent or fee charged for such occupancy:
* * *
(24)(a) * * *
(c)(i) * * *
(ii) The levy of an additional tax pursuant to this Subparagraph shall be
subject to approval by a majority of the electors of Caddo and Bossier parishes who
vote on a proposition authorizing the levy of the tax. The bureau shall call an election
for the purpose of submitting such a proposition to the voters. The election on the
question of the levy of the tax shall be held only once at a regularly scheduled
statewide election. The authority to levy the tax shall terminate on June thirtieth of
the twelfth calendar year after the date of the approval of the taxation election held
pursuant to this Item; however, the authority to levy the tax may be renewed if
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 430 ENROLLED
approved by a majority of the electors of Caddo and Bossier parishes who vote on
a proposition authorizing such renewal. Any election to authorize the renewal shall
be called by the bureau for the purpose of submitting such a proposition to the voters.
The election on the question of the renewal shall be held only once at a regularly
scheduled statewide election. If renewed, the term of renewal shall be as provided
in the proposition authorizing such renewal, not to exceed twelve years.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.